Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 2. Funds Consolidation
§ 9-4-220.1.
Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account; funds transferred to the account.

There is created the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account within the strategic investments and projects account created by W.S.

9-4-220

. Funds in the account shall only be expended upon legislative appropriation. Through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2034, all funds within the account shall be invested in the pool A investment account by the state treasurer pursuant to W.S. 9-4-715(p). Thereafter, all funds within the account shall be invested as determined by the state treasurer. All investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the account. For purposes of accounting and investing only, the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account shall be treated as a separate account from the strategic investments and projects account.

Beginning on June 30, 2021 for fiscal year 2021 and June 30 of each fiscal year thereafter as provided in this subsection, the state treasurer shall transfer ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, from any unobligated funds within the strategic investments and projects account to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account. The state treasurer shall cease transferring funds to the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account pursuant to this subsection on July 1, 2038.

History.

2017 ch. 28, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 114, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted the present third and fourth sentences for the former third sentence, which read: ”All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund,” and added the last sentence; and rewrote (b), which read: “Beginning on June 30, 2019 for fiscal year 2019 and June 30 of each fiscal year as provided in this subsection, one-half (1/2) of the total fund balance in the strategic investments and projects account, at the end of each fiscal year shall be deposited into the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account. The state treasurer shall cease depositing funds into the Wyoming state penitentiary capital construction account pursuant to this subsection when the balance of the account reaches or exceeds two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000.00).”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 28, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 9-4-221.
State facilities construction account created; purposes.

The state facilities construction account created by 2014 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 26, Section 300(h) is continued. Funds within the account shall only be expended upon legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be deposited to the account.

History.

2016 ch. 97, § 1, effective March 11, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 97, § 14, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 9-4-222.
University of Wyoming science initiative account created; purposes.

The University of Wyoming science initiative account created by 2015 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 142, Section 317(c) is continued. Funds within the account shall only be expended upon legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

2016 ch. 97, § 1, effective March 11, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 97, § 14, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 9-4-223.
Casper state facilities account created; purposes.

The Casper state facilities account created by 2015 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 142, Section 346, footnote (f) is continued. Funds within the account shall only be expended upon legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

2016 ch. 97, § 1, effective March 11, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 97, § 14, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8, Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2016.

§ 9-4-224.
School lands mineral royalties account.

The school lands mineral royalties account is created. Funds within the account shall only be expended upon legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the school lands mineral royalties account.

History.

2019 ch. 204, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 204, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 9-4-225.
Capitol square preservation account.

The capitol square preservation account is created. The state treasurer may accept federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, transfers, bequests and donations of money from any source for deposit into the account. Funds within the account are continuously appropriated for maintenance, preservation and enhancement of the capitol building and grounds, the extension from the capitol building to and under the Herschler building and the Herschler building. Appropriations under this section shall only be expended consistent with this section and pursuant to the terms of a memorandum of understanding executed pursuant to W.S. 9-5-106(f). All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.

History.

2021 ch. 140, § 1, effective April 6, 2021; 2022 ch. 49, § 2, effective March 10, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

substituted “are continuously appropriated for maintenance, preservation and enhancement of the capitol building and grounds, the extension from the capitol building to and under the Herschler building and the Herschler building” for “shall only be expended upon legislative appropriation” in the third sentence, added the fourth sentence, and substituted “account” for “general fund” at the end of the present fifth sentence.

Laws 2022, ch. 49, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2022.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 140, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 6, 2021.